Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.020

Annual license required—Expiration date.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of operating a controlled atmosphere storage warehouse or warehouses without first obtaining an annual license from the director. Such license shall expire on August 31st of any one year.

[ 1961 c 29 s 2.]